Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5272.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The third sentence of section 2 of chapter 50 of the acts of 2006 is hereby
amended by striking out the words “, with the approval of the board,”.
SECTION 2. Section 5 of said chapter 50 is hereby repealed.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any and all
funds remaining in the Supplemental Reserve Fund to Ensure Fiscal Stability established under
section 5 of chapter 50 of the acts of 2006 shall be transferred into the Athol-Royalston Regional
School District Financial Stability Fund established under section 2 of said chapter 50 and shall
thereafter be subject to all laws, rules and requirements governing said fund.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1